Montana, session 2025, SB395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Judicial power limited to claims involving legal standing. The grant
in the Montana constitution to the judiciary of "the judicial power" includes only the power to adjudicate claims in
which the claimant or claimants have and maintain legal standing to sue the party or parties against whom relief
is sought as provided in [sections 1 through 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Legal standing defined. Unless otherwise provided by law, a claimant
does not have legal standing to pursue a claim against another party unless:
(1) the claimant shows that the claimant has suffered a specific injury as provided in [section 3] or
faces the real and immediate threat of injury as provided in [section 4];
(2) the claimant shows the injury or threat of injury in subsection (1) was caused by the party sued
or immediately threatened by the party sued; and
(3) the court has power to grant effective relief.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Generalized injury not sufficient for legal standing. An alleged injury
claimed must be real, concrete, and individualized to the party seeking relief. The fact that the claimant is a
citizen, resident, or taxpayer who disagrees with or feels aggrieved by a government policy is not sufficient to
create standing.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Injury may not be speculative. An alleged threat of harm must be real,
direct, and immediate, and not speculative. Fears and apprehensions not due to a real, direct, and immediate
threat are insufficient to create standing.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Injury not created based on public importance. Standing is not
created or maintained solely by a court's conclusion that an issue is one of public importance or is likely to recur
or that a judicial determination will guide public officers in the performance of their duties, or by any combination
of those factors.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 395

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 395.1

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 5] are intended to be
codified as a new part in Title 1, and the provisions of Title 1 apply to [sections 1 through 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Applicability. [This act] applies to legal proceedings instituted on or after
[the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 395